Utah statutes.
49-11-405.   Service credit from different systems or plans -- Eligibility
and calculation of service credit.
(1) (a)  A member who has service credit from two or more systems or one or
more systems and the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan may
combine service credit for purposes of determining eligibility for retirement.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (1)(a) do not apply to concurrent service.
(2)  To be eligible for the calculation under Subsection (3), the member's
service credit earned under the different systems or the Utah Governors' and
Legislators' Retirement Plan shall at least equal the minimum amount of
service credit required to retire from the system which most recently covered
the member.
(3)  If a member meets the requirements of Subsection (2), the office shall
calculate the member's allowance using all service credit earned from any
system or the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan, with no
actuarial reduction applied to the allowance, except the service credit used
to calculate the benefit shall be increased or decreased to reflect the value
of the assets transferred.
(4)  The office shall establish the standards used for calculating any
increase or decrease in the service credit.
(5)  This section does not apply to a retiree who is subject to Section
49-11-504.
